Utah statutes.
63A-9-302.   Committee duties.

The committee shall:

(1)  advise the director about carrying out the director’s responsibilities under this chapter;

(2)  review each administrative rule proposed by the division and make recommendations to the director about those rules; and

(3)  in conjunction with the director, make recommendations to the legislature about any amendments to statute needed to allow the division to fulfill its responsibilities under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 5, 2003 General Session

